Final_code/dictionary.dix
  <pardef n="m/Ana__n">
			<e><p>
		<l>Ana</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>Ana</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>AnA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnawA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnawI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnanA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>AnanA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>Anawe</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>AnawIm</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnanI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnegA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnegI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>AneMgI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>aroge</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnogI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AneMge</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>Ano</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>Anie</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="present"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>anavA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="present"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAo</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>Ane</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="subjunctive"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>Anane</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AniegA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAnA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAIegA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="honorable"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnUz</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>AneM</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnUzgA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnUzgI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="present"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AneMge</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAyA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAwI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAegA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAegI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAUzgA</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAUzgI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAezge</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>anavAezgI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="1st person"/><s n="future"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAne</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnavAwa</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>anavAwI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>anavAwe</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>anavAwIM</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
        	<e><p>
		<l>AnI</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>anavAo</l>
			<r>Ana<s n="verb"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="first causative"/><s n="semi-honorable"/><s n="2nd person"/></r>
		</p></e>
  </pardef>

	<e lm="mAna"><i></i><par n="m/Ana__n"/></e>
